test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_IN_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: kyáambda ín'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: kyáambda ín'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: kyáambda ín'ang'waa'ahlans
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: kyáambda ín'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: kyáambda ín'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: kyáambda ín'ang'waa'ahl
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: kyáambda ín'ang'waaäseehl
